Hawaii statutes.
[§245-58] Illegal sale of export or foreign
cigarettes; revocation or suspension of license; civil penalties. If any
licensee violates this part or any rule adopted pursuant to this part, the
director may:

(1) Revoke or suspend the licensee's license pursuant
to procedures complying with chapter 91; and

(2) Impose a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed
the greater of five times the retail value of the cigarettes involved, or
$5,000. [L 2000, c 201, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next